Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 6

Advisory Commission on Rules

16-3-601. Advisory commission on rules of practice and procedure.

There shall be an advisory commission whose members shall be appointed by the supreme court and whose duty shall be to advise the supreme court from time to time respecting the rules of practice and procedure.

Each member shall serve for a term of three (3) years and members shall be eligible for reappointment; provided, that members shall not be appointed for more than three (3) successive terms.

No compensation shall be paid to any of the members; however, the expenses necessarily incurred by the members in the accomplishment of the purposes of the commission, as set out in this part, shall be reimbursable when statements of expenses are submitted pursuant to policies and guidelines promulgated by the supreme court.

The advisory commission has the authority to employ, subject to the approval of the administrative director of the courts and commissioner of finance and administration, legal, clerical and other assistance that may be necessary to the efficient discharge of its duties.

Acts 1965, ch. 227, § 7; 1975, ch. 376, §§ 2, 4; T.C.A., § 16-118; Acts 1993, ch. 66, § 19; 1993, ch. 196, § 2; 2001, ch. 257, §§ 1-3.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Supreme Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 191.

Cited: Webb v. Nashville Area Habitat for Humanity, Inc., 346 S.W.3d 422, 2011 Tenn. LEXIS 623 (Tenn. July 21, 2011).